Mississippi, session 2026, HB760.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  No elected official may change political party affiliation during such official's term of office.  A "change in political party affiliation" occurs when: (a)  Any elected official publicly declares that he or she is leaving the political party with which he or she was affiliated when he or she was elected to office; (b)  Any elected official publicly declares that he or she is becoming a member of a political party which is different from the political party with which he or she was affiliated at the time of election. (2)  Any change of political party affiliation during an official's term of office shall be considered a resignation by such official and a vacancy for such office.  Any such vacancy shall be filled as provided by law for that office. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.